Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2203
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Real Property Appraiser Act, the definitions found in sections 76-2203.01 to 76-2219.02 shall be used.

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 3;

Laws 1991, LB 203, § 8;

Laws 1994, LB 1107, § 8;

Laws 1999, LB 618, § 2;

Laws 2001, LB 162, § 2;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 15;

Laws 2014, LB717, § 3;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 3;

Laws 2018, LB741, § 3;

Laws 2022, LB707, § 48;

Laws 2024, LB992, § 2.